Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-862
Director; cooperate with other entities.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose of the Commercial Feed Act.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 16.